Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Service by Sheriffs and Constables

§ 691.
Service of civil or criminal process.

Sheriffs and constables may serve either civil or criminal process, anywhere within the State and returnable to any court.

Sheriffs and constables shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for unlawful trespass in serving either civil or criminal process, including citations, summons, subpoenas, warrants, and other court orders, provided the scope of their entrance onto the property of another is no more than necessary to effectuate the service of process.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 49

, § 2.

§ 692.
Deputy sheriffs.

Deputy sheriffs shall have the same powers and be subject to the same liabilities in the service of process as sheriffs, whether the process is directed to the sheriff or the deputy. If a sheriff is confined in prison upon legal process, his or her deputies may serve precepts in their hands at the time and such as they receive within three days thereafter.

§ 693.
Constables.

In the service of process, constables shall have the same powers and be subject to the same liabilities and penalties as sheriffs.

§ 694.
Disqualifications.

An officer shall not serve a writ drawn on a note originally payable to himself or herself and sued in the name of an indorsee, nor where he or she, or a private corporation of which he or she is a member, is a party or interested.

Such officer shall not be disqualified from serving process for or against a town or county by reason of being a taxpayer therein nor for or against a railroad corporation by reason of being a taxpayer in a town owning stock in such corporation, nor for or against a savings bank or savings institution by reason of being a corporator or officer thereof.

§ 695.
Receipt for process.

A person may demand a receipt of an officer to whom he or she delivers a writ or precept, in which the sum or thing in demand, the date of such writ or precept and of its delivery, shall be stated.
On the refusal of such officer to execute such receipt, a person present may subscribe his or her name as a witness to such delivery.

§ 696.
Sheriffs’ duties to receive, execute, and return writs.

Sheriffs shall receive all writs and precepts issuing from lawful authority at any time and place within their respective precincts, unless they can show reasonable cause to the contrary, and shall execute and return the same agreeably to the direction thereof.

§ 697.
Sheriffs’ liabilities.

A sheriff who willfully refuses or neglects to serve or return such writ or precept, or who makes a false or undue return, shall be fined not more than $100.00 with costs and shall pay to the party aggrieved damages sustained thereby.

§ 698.
Special deputations.

The sheriff may depute a proper person to serve a writ at the risk of the plaintiff in such writ by indorsing thereon a special deputation, and, when he or she deems it necessary, may depute some person to serve a warrant in a criminal cause or any other precept by indorsing a special deputation on such writ or precept.

Such special deputy shall make oath to his or her service and return and that he or she did not make or alter the writ, warrant, or precept by him or her served. He or she shall cause to be indorsed thereon a certificate of such oath. Service so made shall be as valid as if made by the sheriff.

§ 699.
Removal or resignation of sheriff.

A sheriff removed from or resigning his or her office or at the expiration of his or her term of office may execute writs or precepts in his or her hands at the time.
Service so made shall be as valid as if made by the sheriff.

§ 700.
Completion of service of process or foreclosure of mortgage or lien.

When an officer who by law may serve process dies, becomes ill, disqualified, or incapacitated, having in his or her hands any process for service, or any chattel mortgage or conditional sale lien for foreclosure, any other officer who may by law serve such process or make such foreclosure and who has a knowledge of the facts may certify the proceedings thereon of such original officer, and make or complete such service or foreclosure, as the case may be

§ 701.
Summons.

Any law enforcement officer authorized to serve criminal process or a State’s Attorney may summon a person who commits an offense to appear before Superior Court by a summons in such form as prescribed by the Court Administrator, stating the time when, and the place where, the person shall appear, signed by the enforcement officer or State’s Attorney and delivered to the person.

When an individual accepts a precharge services contract, the State’s Attorney may issue a new citation ordering the individual to court in the event the individual fails to comply with the terms of the contract. The pretrial monitor may provide the citation to the individual at the time the individual accepts the precharge contract. This shall be considered effective service.

A person so summoned shall appear at the time and place stated in the summons delivered to him or her. A person who does not so appear shall be fined not more than $100.00 or be imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. July 1, 1972; amended

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 1, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2015, No. 12

, § 3, eff. May 1, 2015;

2018, No. 8

(Sp. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 28, 2018.